North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 50B. North Carolina Agricultural Hall of Fame.

§ 106-568.13.
North Carolina Agricultural Hall of Fame created.

There is hereby created and established as an agency of the State of North Carolina the North Carolina Agricultural Hall of Fame.

History.

1953, c. 1129, s. 1.

State Government Reorganization.

The North Carolina Agricultural Hall of Fame was transferred to the Department of Agriculture by

G.S. 143A-61

, enacted by Session Laws 1971, c. 864.

§ 106-568.14.
Board of directors; membership; compensation.

The North Carolina Agricultural Hall of Fame shall be under the general supervision and control of a board of directors consisting of the following: the Commissioner of Agriculture of the State of North Carolina, who shall act as chairman; the Director of the North Carolina Agricultural Extension Service; the State Supervisor of Vocational Agriculture; the President of the North Carolina Farm Bureau Federation; the Master of the State Grange, the foregoing being ex officio members; and three members who shall be appointed by the Governor of North Carolina. All of said members shall serve without compensation.

History.

1953, c. 1129, s. 2.

§ 106-568.15.
Terms of directors.

One of the appointive members shall be appointed for a term of two years, one for a term of four years and one for a term of six years. The successor to each of the appointive members shall be appointed for a term of six years, and in case of a vacancy, the Governor is authorized to appoint a successor for the remainder of the unexpired term. The ex officio members shall serve so long as they hold their respective offices or positions which entitle them to ex officio membership on said board of directors.

History.

1953, c. 1129, s. 3.

§ 106-568.16.
Admission of candidates to Hall of Fame.

The said board is hereby empowered to formulate rules and regulations governing acceptance and admission of candidates to said North Carolina Agricultural Hall of Fame, provided that no name shall be accepted until an authentic and written record of achievements of said person in agricultural activities shall have been presented to and accepted by a majority vote of said board created by this Article, and provided that both men and women are eligible for recognition.

History.

1953, c. 1129, s. 4.

§ 106-568.17.
Acceptance of gifts, devises, and awards; display thereof.

The said board is hereby empowered to accept and receive gifts, devises, and awards which are to become the sole property of said North Carolina Agricultural Hall of Fame and are to be kept in a proper manner in a suitable room or hall in some state-owned building in Raleigh, provided that duplicates of such gifts, devises, and awards may be displayed in a suitable room or hall in the School of Agriculture of the North Carolina State College of Agriculture and Engineering at Raleigh, North Carolina.

History.

1953, c. 1129, s. 5; 2011-284, s. 73.

Cross References.

For designation of North Carolina State College of Agriculture and Engineering as North Carolina State University at Raleigh, see

G.S. 116-2

, 116-4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-284, s. 73, effective June 24, 2011, substituted “devises” for “bequests” in the section heading and twice in the section text.